Maryland, session 2025, SB0163.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
2–105.
(a) The Secretary shall establish general policy for, and adopt standards to
promote and guide the development of, the physical and mental [hygiene] HEALTH services
of this State and its subdivisions.
10–208.
(a) (1) There is a continuing, nonlapsing Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH
Community–Based Services Fund.
(2) The purpose of the Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based
Services Fund is to ensure that funds realized from the sale or lease of Behavioral Health
Administration facilities as the result of downsizing, consolidation, or closure are used to
provide community–based services.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if any Behavioral Health
Administration facility is downsized, consolidated, or closed, all State property associated
with the facility that is not transferred to another governmental entity shall be sold or
leased at fair market value, and the net proceeds of the sale or lease shall be deposited into
the Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based Services Fund.
– 1 –

Ch. 760 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(c) (1) If a facility operated by the Behavioral Health Administration is
downsized, consolidated, or closed such that the net resident population declines or if a
facility is closed or consolidated and bed capacity levels remained unchanged:
(i) State general funds may be appropriated as necessary, in
advance, to assist in the downsizing;
(ii) Any funds in the Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based
Services Fund:
1. May not supplant resources for existing community
services; and
2. Shall be used to meet the needs of individuals leaving
facilities to enter community–based services; and
(iii) Any funds remaining after meeting the needs of individuals
identified in subparagraph (ii)2 of this paragraph shall be used to increase the availability
of:
1. Affordable housing and employment opportunities for
individuals with mental illness; and
2. Community mental health services designed to promote
recovery and community integration, including development of the Maryland Mental
Health Crisis Response System established under Subtitle 14 of this title.
(2) Funds in the Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based Services
Fund shall be spent in accordance with a plan developed by the Behavioral Health
Administration in consultation with consumers, family members, providers, and mental
health advocates.
(d) On or before January 1 of each year, the Secretary shall prepare a report to
be submitted to the General Assembly and the Department of Legislative Services on the
Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based Services Fund.
(e) Any unspent portions of the Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based
Services Fund and any interest earned on money in the Waiting List Equity Fund may not
be transferred or revert to the General Fund of the State but shall remain in the Mental
[Hygiene] HEALTH Community–Based Services Fund to be used for the purposes specified
in this section.
Subtitle 3. Special Provisions as to Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH.
16–301.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 760
Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, Subtitle 2 of this title applies to a
recipient of services under the Maryland Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH Law.
16–303.
(b) (1) If any property of an individual admitted under the Maryland Mental
[Hygiene] HEALTH Law remains in the custody of a public facility for 1 year after the
death or escape of the individual, the administrative head of the facility shall investigate
to determine if any other person legally is entitled to that property.
(2) If such a person is not found:
(i) As much as possible of the account of the individual at the facility
shall be paid from the property; and
(ii) Any balance becomes the property of this State and shall be paid
into the General Fund of this State.
24–1105.
(b) In accordance with an appropriation approved by the General Assembly in the
State budget, the Comptroller shall transfer:
(1) The investment earnings of the Developmental Disabilities
Administration account of the Trust Fund into the Waiting List Equity Fund established
under § 7–205 of this article; and
(2) The proceeds and investment earnings of the Behavioral Health
Administration account of the Trust Fund into the Mental [Hygiene] HEALTH
Community–Based Services Fund established under § 10–208 of this article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on:
(a) On or before October 1, 2026 July 1, 2027, the Maryland Department of Health
shall conduct a thorough review of Department regulations and adopt regulations to replace
any reference to “mental hygiene” with “mental health” for consistency with this Act.
(b) The Department shall update all public–facing electronic materials to be
consistent with this Act as soon as practicable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –